District of Columbia statutes.
3-1503

Repealed

Board of Accountancy.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 4, 24 DCR 5975
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142
Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.
1973 Ed., § 2-943.
1981 Ed., § 2-103.